California, session 20252026, AB260.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) It is the longstanding public policy of this state to promote access to reproductive health care, including abortion care, without unnecessary burdens or restrictions on patients or providers. Every pregnant individual has the fundamental right to choose to have an abortion, a right that is secured by the California Constitution.(b) Recent federal action and litigation has raised uncertainty about the continued availability nationwide of mifepristone, a drug that has been clinically proven to be part of a safe and effective means of providing medication abortion.(c) The continued attacks on reproductive freedom across the country require immediate action to protect the right to abortion access, including access to medication abortion, in California.(d) The Tenth Amendment to the United States Constitution and the United States Supreme Court have long recognized states’ police powers and that “direct control of medical practice in the states is beyond the power of federal government” (Linder v. United States (1925) 268 U.S. 5, 18).(e) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure continued access to medication abortion that has been proven safe and effective for two decades in California for individuals seeking abortion care.SEC. 2. Section 601 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.SEC. 3. Section 687 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:687. (a) A healing arts practitioner who is authorized to prescribe, furnish, order, or administer dangerous drugs shall not be subject to a civil or criminal action or disciplinary or other administrative proceeding solely on the basis that the practitioner prescribed, furnished, ordered, or administered brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion for a use that is different from the use for which that drug has been approved for marketing by the United States Food and Drug Administration or that varies from an approved risk evaluation and mitigation strategy pursuant to Section 355-1 of Title 21 of the United States Code, except if the state deems it necessary to address an imminent health or safety concern regarding brand name or generic mifepristone.(b) Pursuant to Sections 1 and 1.1 of Article I of the California Constitution and the Reproductive Privacy Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 123460) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code), the authority of a healing arts practitioner to prescribe, furnish, order, or administer brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion is the practice of medicine, and the laws of another state or federal actions that interfere with the ability of a practitioner to prescribe, furnish, order, or administer brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion if that action is lawful under the laws of the state, are against the public policy of this state.SEC. 4. Section 850.3 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:850.3. (a) Notwithstanding any other state law, and consistent with Sections 1 and 1.1 of Article I of the California Constitution, an individual or state or local officer shall not commence a criminal, civil, professional discipline, or licensing action against an individual licensed or certified by a healing arts board concerning the manufacture, transport, distribution, delivery, receipt, acquisition, sale, possession, furnishment, dispensation, repackaging, or storage of brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that is lawful under the laws of the state.(b) A healing arts board shall not suspend a license, revoke a license, or otherwise take disciplinary action against a licensee solely on the basis that the licensee manufactured, transported, distributed, delivered, received, acquired, sold, possessed, furnished, dispensed, repackaged, or stored brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that is lawful under the laws of the state.(c) A healing arts board shall not deny an application for licensure, or suspend a license, revoke a license, or otherwise impose discipline upon a licensee or health care practitioner subject to this division solely because the licensee or practitioner was convicted or disciplined in another state solely for an activity related to brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that, if performed in this state, would not be grounds for denial, suspension, revocation, or other discipline.SEC. 5. Section 2519 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2519. The board may suspend, revoke, or place on probation the license of a midwife for any of the following:(a) Unprofessional conduct, which includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:(1) Incompetence or gross negligence in carrying out the usual functions of a licensed midwife.(2) Conviction of a violation of Section 2052, in which event, the record of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence thereof.(3) The use of advertising that is fraudulent or misleading.(4) Obtaining or possessing in violation of law, or prescribing, or except as directed by a licensed physician and surgeon, dentist, or podiatrist administering to themselves, or furnishing or administering to another, any controlled substance as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code or any dangerous drug as defined in Article 8 (commencing with Section 4210) of Chapter 9 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.(5) The use of any controlled substance as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, or any dangerous drug as defined in Article 8 (commencing with Section 4210) of Chapter 9 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or alcoholic beverages, to an extent or in a manner dangerous or injurious to themselves, any other person, or the public, or to the extent that this use impairs their ability to conduct with safety to the public the practice authorized by their license.(6) Conviction of a criminal offense involving the prescription, consumption, or self-administration of any of the substances described in paragraphs (4) and (5), or the possession of, or falsification of, a record pertaining to, the substances described in paragraph (4), in which event the record of the conviction is conclusive evidence thereof.(7) Commitment or confinement by a court of competent jurisdiction for intemperate use of or addiction to the use of any of the substances described in paragraphs (4) and (5), in which event the court order of commitment or confinement is prima facie evidence of such commitment or confinement.(8) Falsifying, or making grossly incorrect, grossly inconsistent, or unintelligible entries in any hospital, patient, or other record pertaining to the substances described in subdivision (a).(b) Procuring a license by fraud or misrepresentation.(c) Conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a midwife, as determined by the board. (d) Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate any provision or term of this chapter.(e) Making or giving any false statement or information in connection with the application for issuance of a license.(f) Impersonating any applicant or acting as proxy for an applicant in any examination required under this chapter for the issuance of a license or a certificate.(g) Impersonating another licensed practitioner, or permitting or allowing another person to use their license or certificate for the purpose of providing midwifery services.(h) Aiding or assisting, or agreeing to aid or assist any person or persons, whether a licensed physician or not, in the performance of, or arranging for, a violation of any of the provisions of Article 12 (commencing with Section 2221) of Chapter 5.(i)  Failing to do any of the following when required pursuant to Section 2507:(1) Consult with a physician and surgeon.(2) Refer a client to a physician and surgeon.(3) Transfer a client to a hospital.SEC. 6. Section 2761 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2761. The board may take disciplinary action against a certified or licensed nurse or deny an application for a certificate or license for any of the following:(a) Unprofessional conduct, which includes, but is not limited to, the following:(1) Incompetence or gross negligence in carrying out usual certified or licensed nursing functions.(2) A conviction of practicing medicine without a license in violation of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000), in which event the record of conviction shall be conclusive evidence thereof.(3) The use of advertising relating to nursing that violates Section 17500.(4) Denial of licensure, revocation, suspension, restriction, or any other disciplinary action against a health care professional license or certificate by another state or territory of the United States, by any other government agency, or by another California health care professional licensing board. A certified copy of the decision or judgment shall be conclusive evidence of that action.(b) Procuring their certificate or license by fraud, misrepresentation, or mistake. (c) Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violating of, or conspiring to violate any provision or term of this chapter or regulations adopted pursuant to it.(d) Making or giving any false statement or information in connection with the application for issuance of a certificate or license.(e) Conviction of a felony or of any offense substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a registered nurse, in which event the record of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence thereof.(f) Impersonating any applicant or acting as proxy for an applicant in any examination required under this chapter for the issuance of a certificate or license.(g) Impersonating another certified or licensed practitioner, or permitting or allowing another person to use their certificate or license for the purpose of nursing the sick or afflicted.(h) Aiding or assisting, or agreeing to aid or assist any person or persons, whether a licensed physician or not, in the performance of, or arranging for, a violation of any of the provisions of Article 12 (commencing with Section 2220) of Chapter 5.(i) Holding oneself out to the public or to any practitioner of the healing arts as a nurse practitioner or as meeting the standards established by the board for a nurse practitioner unless meeting the standards established by the board pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 2834) or holding oneself out to the public as being certified by the board as a nurse anesthetist, nurse midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or public health nurse unless the person is at the time certified by the board.(j) (1) Except for good cause, the knowing failure to protect patients by failing to follow infection control guidelines of the board, thereby risking transmission of blood-borne infectious diseases from licensed or certified nurse to patient, from patient to patient, and from patient to licensed or certified nurse. In administering this subdivision, the board shall consider referencing the standards, regulations, and guidelines of the State Department of Public Health developed pursuant to Section 1250.11 of the Health and Safety Code and the standards, guidelines, and regulations pursuant to the California Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1973 (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 5 of the Labor Code) for preventing the transmission of HIV, hepatitis B, and other blood-borne pathogens in health care settings. As necessary, the board shall consult with the Medical Board of California, the Podiatric Medical Board of California, the Dental Board of California, and the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians, to encourage appropriate consistency in the implementation of this subdivision.(2) The board shall seek to ensure that licentiates and others regulated by the board are informed of the responsibility of licentiates to minimize the risk of transmission of blood-borne infectious diseases from health care provider to patient, from patient to patient, and from patient to health care provider, and of the most recent scientifically recognized safeguards for minimizing the risks of transmission.SEC. 7. Section 2878 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2878. The board may suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter for any of the following:(a) Unprofessional conduct, which includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:(1) Incompetence, or gross negligence in carrying out usual nursing functions.(2) A conviction of practicing medicine without a license in violation of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000), in which event the record of conviction shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction.(3) The use of advertising relating to nursing which violates Section 17500.(4) The use of excessive force upon or the mistreatment or abuse of any patient. For the purposes of this paragraph, “excessive force” means force clearly in excess of that which would normally be applied in similar clinical circumstances.(5) The failure to maintain confidentiality of patient medical information, except as disclosure is otherwise permitted or required by law.(6) Failure to report to the commission any act prohibited by this section.(b) Procuring a certificate by fraud, misrepresentation, or mistake.(c) Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violating of, or conspiring to violate any provision or term of this chapter.(d) Making or giving any false statement or information in connection with the application for issuance of a license.(e) Conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a licensed vocational nurse, in which event the record of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction.(f) Impersonating any applicant or acting as proxy for an applicant in any examination required under this chapter for the issuance of a license.(g) Impersonating another practitioner, misrepresenting professional credentials or licensure status, or permitting another person to use the licensee’s certificate or license.(h) Aiding or assisting, or agreeing to aid or assist any person or persons, whether a licensed physician or not, in the performance of or arranging for a violation of Article 12 (commencing with Section 2220) of Chapter 5.(i) The commission of any act involving dishonesty, when that action is related to the duties and functions of the licensee.(j) The commission of any act punishable as a sexually related crime, if that act is substantially related to the duties and functions of the licensee.(k) Except for good cause, the knowing failure to protect patients by failing to follow infection control guidelines of the board, thereby risking transmission of blood-borne infectious diseases from licensee to patient, from patient to patient, and from patient to licensee. In administering this subdivision, the board shall consider referencing the standards, regulations, and guidelines of the State Department of Public Health developed pursuant to Section 1250.11 of the Health and Safety Code and the standards, guidelines, and regulations pursuant to the California Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1973 (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 5 of the Labor Code) for preventing the transmission of HIV, hepatitis B, and other blood-borne pathogens in health care settings. As necessary, the board shall consult with the Medical Board of California, the Podiatric Medical Board of California, the Board of Dental Examiners, and the Board of Registered Nursing, to encourage appropriate consistency in the implementation of this subdivision.(l) The board shall seek to ensure that licentiates and others regulated by the board are informed of the responsibility of licentiates and others to follow infection control guidelines, and of the most recent scientifically recognized safeguards for minimizing the risk of transmission of blood-borne infectious diseases.SEC. 8. Section 4076 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4076. (a) A pharmacist shall not dispense a prescription except in a container that meets the requirements of state and federal law and is correctly labeled with all of the following:(1) Except when the prescriber or the certified nurse-midwife who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure or protocol described in Section 2746.51, the nurse practitioner who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure described in Section 2836.1 or protocol, the physician assistant who functions pursuant to Section 3502.1, the naturopathic doctor who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure or protocol described in Section 3640.5, or the pharmacist who functions pursuant to a policy, procedure, or protocol pursuant to Section 4052.1, 4052.2, or 4052.6 orders otherwise, either the manufacturer’s trade name of the drug or the generic name and the name of the manufacturer. Commonly used abbreviations may be used. Preparations containing two or more active ingredients may be identified by the manufacturer’s trade name or the commonly used name or the principal active ingredients.(2) The directions for the use of the drug.(3) The name of the patient or patients.(4) The name of the prescriber or, if applicable, the name of the certified nurse-midwife who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure or protocol described in Section 2746.51, the nurse practitioner who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure described in Section 2836.1 or protocol, the physician assistant who functions pursuant to Section 3502.1, the naturopathic doctor who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure or protocol described in Section 3640.5, or the pharmacist who functions pursuant to a policy, procedure, or protocol pursuant to Section 4052.1, 4052.2, or 4052.6.(5) The date of issue.(6) The name and address of the pharmacy, and prescription number or other means of identifying the prescription.(7) The strength of the drug or drugs dispensed.(8) The quantity of the drug or drugs dispensed.(9) The expiration date of the effectiveness of the drug dispensed.(10) The condition or purpose for which the drug was prescribed if the condition or purpose is indicated on the prescription.(11) (A) Commencing January 1, 2006, the physical description of the dispensed medication, including its color, shape, and any identification code that appears on the tablets or capsules, except as follows:(i) Prescriptions dispensed by a veterinarian.(ii) An exemption from the requirements of this paragraph shall be granted to a new drug for the first 120 days that the drug is on the market and for the 90 days during which the national reference file has no description on file.(iii) Dispensed medications for which no physical description exists in a commercially available database.(B) This paragraph applies to outpatient pharmacies only.(C) The information required by this paragraph may be printed on an auxiliary label that is affixed to the prescription container.(D) This paragraph shall not become operative if the board, prior to January 1, 2006, adopts regulations that mandate the same labeling requirements set forth in this paragraph.(b) If a pharmacist dispenses a prescribed drug by means of a unit dose medication system, as defined by administrative regulation, for a patient in a skilled nursing, intermediate care, or other health care facility, the requirements of this section will be satisfied if the unit dose medication system contains the aforementioned information or the information is otherwise readily available at the time of drug administration.(c) If a pharmacist dispenses a dangerous drug or device in a facility licensed pursuant to Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, it is not necessary to include on individual unit dose containers for a specific patient, the name of the certified nurse-midwife who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure or protocol described in Section 2746.51, the nurse practitioner who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure described in Section 2836.1 or protocol, the physician assistant who functions pursuant to Section 3502.1, the naturopathic doctor who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure or protocol described in Section 3640.5, or the pharmacist who functions pursuant to a policy, procedure, or protocol pursuant to Section 4052.1, 4052.2, or 4052.6.(d) If a pharmacist dispenses a prescription drug for use in a facility licensed pursuant to Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, it is not necessary to include the information required in paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) when the prescription drug is administered to a patient by a person licensed under the Medical Practice Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000)), the Nursing Practice Act (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700)), or the Vocational Nursing Practice Act (Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 2840)), who is acting within the scope of practice.(e) A pharmacist shall use professional judgment to provide a patient with directions for use that enhance the patient’s understanding of those directions, consistent with the prescriber’s instructions.(f) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or any other law, a pharmacist may dispense a drug prescribed pursuant to Section 120582 of the Health and Safety Code and label the drug without the name of an individual for whom the drug is intended if the prescription includes the words “expedited partner therapy” or the letters “EPT.”(2) A pharmacist who prescribes, dispenses, furnishes, or otherwise renders EPT, as authorized in subdivision (f), shall not be liable in, and shall not be subject to, a civil, criminal, or administrative action, sanction, or penalty for rendering EPT, if the use of EPT is in compliance with this section, except in cases of intentional misconduct, gross negligence, or wanton or reckless activity.(3) A pharmacist who provides EPT under this section shall provide written notification that describes the right of an individual who receives EPT to consult with a pharmacist about the medication dispensed and additional information regarding possible drug interactions.(g) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or any other law, a pharmacist may, at their discretion, dispense brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion without the name of the patient as required in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the name of the prescriber as required in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), or the name and address of the pharmacy as required in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) if the prescription is labeled with a prescription number or other means of identifying the prescription.(2) A pharmacist who dispenses, furnishes, or otherwise renders brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion, as authorized in paragraph (1), shall maintain a log with the prescription numbers and the information required in paragraphs (1) to (10), inclusive, of subdivision (a).(3) Notwithstanding Section 4081, all records maintained under paragraph (2) shall not be open to inspection by law enforcement without a valid, court-issued subpoena.(4) This subdivision does not prohibit the investigation of an activity that is punishable as a crime under the laws of this state, provided that records maintained under paragraph (2) are not shared with an individual or entity from another state.(5) A pharmacist shall inform the patient that the pharmacist is dispensing brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion as authorized by this subdivision.SEC. 8.5. Section 4076 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4076. (a) A pharmacist shall not dispense a prescription except in a container that meets the requirements of state and federal law and is correctly labeled with all of the following:(1) Except when the prescriber or the certified nurse-midwife who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure or protocol described in Section 2746.51, the nurse practitioner who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure described in Section 2836.1 or protocol, the physician assistant who functions pursuant to Section 3502.1, the naturopathic doctor who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure or protocol described in Section 3640.5, or the pharmacist who functions pursuant to Section 4052 or pursuant to a policy, procedure, or protocol pursuant to Section 4052.1, 4052.2, or 4052.6 orders otherwise, either the manufacturer’s trade name of the drug or the generic name and the name of the manufacturer. Commonly used abbreviations may be used. Preparations containing two or more active ingredients may be identified by the manufacturer’s trade name or the commonly used name or the principal active ingredients.(2) The directions for the use of the drug.(3) The name of the patient or patients.(4) The name of the prescriber or, if applicable, the name of the certified nurse-midwife who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure or protocol described in Section 2746.51, the nurse practitioner who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure described in Section 2836.1 or protocol, the physician assistant who functions pursuant to Section 3502.1, the naturopathic doctor who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure or protocol described in Section 3640.5, or the pharmacist who functions pursuant to Section 4052 or pursuant to a policy, procedure, or protocol pursuant to Section 4052.1, 4052.2, or 4052.6.(5) The date of issue.(6) The name and address of the pharmacy, and prescription number or other means of identifying the prescription.(7) The strength of the drug or drugs dispensed.(8) The quantity of the drug or drugs dispensed.(9) The expiration date of the effectiveness of the drug dispensed.(10) The condition or purpose for which the drug was prescribed if the condition or purpose is indicated on the prescription.(11) (A) Commencing January 1, 2006, the physical description of the dispensed medication, including its color, shape, and any identification code that appears on the tablets or capsules, except as follows:(i) Prescriptions dispensed by a veterinarian.(ii) An exemption from the requirements of this paragraph shall be granted to a new drug for the first 120 days that the drug is on the market and for the 90 days during which the national reference file has no description on file.(iii) Dispensed medications for which no physical description exists in a commercially available database.(B) This paragraph applies to outpatient pharmacies only.(C) The information required by this paragraph may be printed on an auxiliary label that is affixed to the prescription container.(D) This paragraph shall not become operative if the board, prior to January 1, 2006, adopts regulations that mandate the same labeling requirements set forth in this paragraph.(b) If a pharmacist dispenses a prescribed drug by means of a unit dose medication system, as defined by administrative regulation, for a patient in a skilled nursing, intermediate care, or other health care facility, the requirements of this section will be satisfied if the unit dose medication system contains the aforementioned information or the information is otherwise readily available at the time of drug administration.(c) If a pharmacist dispenses a dangerous drug or device in a facility licensed pursuant to Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, it is not necessary to include on individual unit dose containers for a specific patient, the name of the certified nurse-midwife who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure or protocol described in Section 2746.51, the nurse practitioner who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure described in Section 2836.1 or protocol, the physician assistant who functions pursuant to Section 3502.1, the naturopathic doctor who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure or protocol described in Section 3640.5, or the pharmacist who functions pursuant to Section 4052 or pursuant to a policy, procedure, or protocol pursuant to Section 4052.1, 4052.2, or 4052.6.(d) If a pharmacist dispenses a prescription drug for use in a facility licensed pursuant to Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, it is not necessary to include the information required in paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) when the prescription drug is administered to a patient by a person licensed under the Medical Practice Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000)), the Nursing Practice Act (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700)), or the Vocational Nursing Practice Act (Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 2840)), who is acting within the scope of practice.(e) A pharmacist shall use professional judgment to provide a patient with directions for use that enhance the patient’s understanding of those directions, consistent with the prescriber’s instructions.(f) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or any other law, a pharmacist may dispense a drug prescribed pursuant to Section 120582 of the Health and Safety Code and label the drug without the name of an individual for whom the drug is intended if the prescription includes the words “expedited partner therapy” or the letters “EPT.”(2) A pharmacist who prescribes, dispenses, furnishes, or otherwise renders EPT, as authorized in subdivision (f), shall not be liable in, and shall not be subject to, a civil, criminal, or administrative action, sanction, or penalty for rendering EPT, if the use of EPT is in compliance with this section, except in cases of intentional misconduct, gross negligence, or wanton or reckless activity.(3) A pharmacist who provides EPT under this section shall provide written notification that describes the right of an individual who receives EPT to consult with a pharmacist about the medication dispensed and additional information regarding possible drug interactions.(g) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or any other law, a pharmacist may, at their discretion, dispense brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion without the name of the patient as required in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the name of the prescriber as required in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), or the name and address of the pharmacy as required in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) if the prescription is labeled with a prescription number or other means of identifying the prescription.(2) A pharmacist who dispenses, furnishes, or otherwise renders brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion, as authorized in paragraph (1), shall maintain a log with the prescription numbers and the information required in paragraphs (1) to (10), inclusive, of subdivision (a).(3) Notwithstanding Section 4081, all records maintained under paragraph (2) shall not be open to inspection by law enforcement without a valid, court-issued subpoena.(4) This subdivision does not prohibit the investigation of an activity that is punishable as a crime under the laws of this state, provided that records maintained under paragraph (2) are not shared with an individual or entity from another state.(5) A pharmacist shall inform the patient that the pharmacist is dispensing brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion as authorized by this subdivision.SEC. 9. Section 4318 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:4318. (a) Notwithstanding any other state law, and consistent with Sections 1 and 1.1 of Article I of the California Constitution, an individual or state or local officer shall not commence a criminal, civil, professional discipline, or licensing action concerning the manufacture, transport, distribution, delivery, receipt, acquisition, sale, possession, furnishment, dispensation, repackaging, or storage of brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that is lawful under the laws of the state.(b) The board shall not suspend a license, revoke a license, or otherwise take disciplinary action against a licensee solely on the basis that the licensee manufactured, transported, distributed, delivered, received, acquired, sold, possessed, furnished, dispensed, repackaged, or stored brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that is lawful under the laws of the state.(c) The board shall not deny an application for licensure, or suspend a license, revoke a license, or otherwise impose discipline upon a licensee solely because the licensee is licensed in another state and was convicted or disciplined in that state solely for an activity related to brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that, if performed in this state, would not be grounds for denial, suspension, revocation, or other discipline.SEC. 10. Section 4521 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4521. The board may suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter for any of the following reasons:(a) Unprofessional conduct, which includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:(1) Incompetence or gross negligence in carrying out usual psychiatric technician functions.(2) A conviction of practicing medicine without a license in violation of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2, the record of conviction being conclusive evidence thereof.(3) The use of advertising relating to psychiatric technician services which violates Section 17500.(4) Obtain or possess in violation of law, or prescribe, or, except as directed by a licensed physician and surgeon, dentist, or podiatrist, administer to the licensee or furnish or administer to another, any controlled substance as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code or any dangerous drug as defined in Section 4022.(5) Use any controlled substance as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, or any dangerous drug as defined in Section 4022, or alcoholic beverages, to an extent or in a manner dangerous or injurious to the licensee, any other person, or the public or to the extent that the use impairs the ability to conduct with safety to the public the practice authorized by their license.(6) Be convicted of a criminal offense involving the falsification of records concerning prescription, possession, or consumption of any of the substances described in paragraphs (4) and (5), in which event the record of the conviction is conclusive evidence of the conviction. The board may inquire into the circumstances surrounding the commission of the crime in order to fix the degree of discipline.(7) Be committed or confined by a court of competent jurisdiction for intemperate use of or addiction to the use of any of the substances described in paragraphs (4) and (5), in which event the court order of commitment or confinement is prima facie evidence of the commitment or confinement.(8) Falsify, or make grossly incorrect, grossly inconsistent, or unintelligible entries in any hospital, patient, or other record pertaining to the substances described in paragraph (4).(b) Procuring a certificate or license by fraud, misrepresentation, or mistake.(c) Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate any provision or terms of this chapter.(d) Giving any false statement or information in connection with an application.(e) Conviction of any offense substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a psychiatric technician, in which event the record of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction. The board may inquire into the circumstances surrounding the commission of the crime in order to fix the degree of discipline.(f) Impersonating any applicant or acting as proxy for an applicant in any examination required by this chapter.(g) Impersonating another practitioner, or permitting another person to use the licensee’s certificate or license.(h) The use of excessive force upon or the mistreatment or abuse of any patient.(i) Aiding or assisting, or agreeing to aid or assist any person or persons, whether a licensed physician or not, in the performance of or arranging for a violation of any of the provisions of Article 12 (commencing with Section 2220) of Chapter 5 of Division 2.(j) Failure to maintain confidentiality of patient medical information, except as disclosure is otherwise permitted or required by law.(k) Failure to report to the commission any act prohibited by this section.(l) The commission of any act punishable as a sexually related crime, if that act is substantially related to the duties and functions of the licensee.(m) The commission of any act involving dishonesty, when that action is substantially related to the duties and functions of the licensee.(n) Except for good cause, the knowing failure to protect patients by failing to follow infection control guidelines, thereby risking transmission of blood-borne infectious diseases from licensee to patient, from patient to patient, and from patient to licensee. In administering this subdivision, the board shall consider the standards, regulations, and guidelines of the State Department of Public Health developed pursuant to Section 1250.11 of the Health and Safety Code and the standards, guidelines, and regulations pursuant to the California Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1973 (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 5 of the Labor Code) for preventing the transmission of HIV, hepatitis B, and other blood-borne pathogens in health care settings. As necessary, the board shall consult with the Medical Board of California, the Board of Dental Examiners, and the Board of Registered Nursing, to encourage appropriate consistency in the implementation of this section.(o) The board shall seek to ensure that licentiates and others regulated by the board are informed of the responsibility of licentiates and others to follow infection control guidelines, and of the most recent scientifically recognized safeguards for minimizing the risk of transmission of blood-borne infectious diseases.SEC. 11. Section 56.110 of the Civil Code is amended to read:56.110. (a) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 56.10, a provider of health care, health care service plan, pharmaceutical company, contractor, or employer shall not knowingly disclose, transmit, transfer, share, or grant access to medical information in an electronic health records system or through a health information exchange that would identify an individual and that is related to an individual seeking, obtaining, providing, supporting, or aiding in the performance of an abortion that is lawful under the laws of this state to any individual or entity from another state, unless the disclosure, transmittal, transfer, sharing, or granting of access is authorized under any of the following conditions:(1) In accordance with a valid, written authorization pursuant to Section 56.11 that clearly states that medical information on abortion or abortion-related services may be disclosed, and only to the extent and for the purposes expressly stated in the authorization.(2) In accordance with paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 56.10, to the extent necessary to allow responsibility for payment to be determined and payment to be made or to the extent that it is not further disclosed by the recipient in a way that would violate this part.(3) In accordance with paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 56.10 for the purpose of accreditation, in reviewing the competence or qualifications of health care professionals, or in reviewing health care services with respect to medical necessity, level of care, quality of care, or justification of charges.(4) In accordance with paragraph (7) of subdivision (c) of Section 56.10, for the purpose of bona fide research. Institutional Review Boards shall consider the potential harm to the patient and the patient’s privacy when the research uses data that contains information related to abortion or abortion-related services and the research is performed out of state.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the content of the health records containing medical information described in subdivision (a) shall be disclosed to any of the following:(1) A patient, or their personal representative, consistent with the Patient Access to Health Records Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 123100) of Part 1 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code).(2) In response to an order of a California or federal court, but only to the extent clearly stated in the order and consistent with Section 1543 of the Penal Code, if applicable, and only if all information about the patient’s identity and records are protected from public scrutiny through mechanisms, including, but not limited to, a sealed proceeding or court record.(3) When expressly required by federal law that preempts California law, but only to the extent expressly required.(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a provider of health care, health care service plan, pharmaceutical company, contractor, or employer from cooperating or complying with the investigation of activity that is punishable as a crime under the laws of California, and that took place in California.(d) A provider of health care, as defined in Section 56.05, shall not be subject to liability for damages or to civil or enforcement actions, including disciplinary actions, fines, or penalties, for failure to meet the requirements of this section before January 31, 2027, if the provider of health care is working diligently and in good faith to come into compliance with this section.SEC. 12. Section 6925 of the Family Code is amended to read:6925. (a) A minor may consent to medical care related to the prevention or treatment of pregnancy.(b) This section does not authorize a minor to be sterilized without the consent of the minor’s parent or guardian.SEC. 13. Section 1220.2 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1220.2. (a) Notwithstanding any other state law, and consistent with Sections 1 and 1.1 of Article I of the California Constitution, an individual or state or local officer shall not commence a criminal, civil, professional discipline, or licensing action against a licensee concerning the transport, distribution, delivery, receipt, acquisition, sale, possession, furnishment, dispensation, repackaging, or storage of brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that is lawful under the laws of the state.(b) The department shall not suspend a license, revoke a license, or otherwise take disciplinary action against a licensee solely on the basis that the licensee transported, distributed, delivered, received, acquired, sold, possessed, furnished, dispensed, repackaged, or stored brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that is lawful under the laws of the state.(c) The department shall not deny an application for licensure, or suspend a license, revoke a license, or otherwise impose discipline upon a licensee solely because the licensee is licensed in another state and was convicted or disciplined in that state solely for an activity related to brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that, if performed in this state, would not be grounds for denial, suspension, revocation, or other discipline.SEC. 14. Section 1265.12 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1265.12. (a) Notwithstanding any other state law, and consistent with Sections 1 and 1.1 of Article I of the California Constitution, an individual or state or local officer shall not commence a criminal, civil, professional discipline, or licensing action against a licensee concerning the transport, distribution, delivery, receipt, acquisition, sale, possession, furnishment, dispensation, repackaging, or storage of brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that is lawful under the laws of the state.(b) The department shall not suspend a license, revoke a license, or otherwise take disciplinary action against a licensee solely on the basis that the licensee transported, distributed, delivered, received, acquired, sold, possessed, furnished, dispensed, repackaged, or stored brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that is lawful under the laws of the state.(c) The department shall not deny an application for licensure, or suspend a license, revoke a license, or otherwise impose discipline upon a licensee solely because the licensee is licensed in another state and was convicted or disciplined in that state solely for an activity related to brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that, if performed in this state, would not be grounds for denial, suspension, revocation, or other discipline.SEC. 15. Section 1367.21 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1367.21. (a) A health care service plan contract that covers prescription drug benefits shall not be issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this state if the plan limits or excludes coverage for a drug on the basis that the drug is prescribed for a use that is different from the use for which that drug has been approved for marketing by the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA), provided that all of the following conditions have been met:(1) The drug is approved by the FDA.(2) (A) The drug is prescribed by a participating licensed health care professional for the treatment of a life-threatening condition; or(B) The drug is prescribed by a participating licensed health care professional for the treatment of a chronic and seriously debilitating condition, the drug is medically necessary to treat that condition, and the drug is on the plan formulary. If the drug is not on the plan formulary, the participating subscriber’s request shall be considered pursuant to the process required by Section 1367.24.(3) The drug has been recognized for treatment of that condition by any of the following:(A) The American Hospital Formulary Service’s Drug Information.(B) One of the following compendia, if recognized by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services as part of an anticancer chemotherapeutic regimen:(i) The Elsevier Gold Standard’s Clinical Pharmacology.(ii) The National Comprehensive Cancer Network Drug and Biologics Compendium.(iii) The Thomson Micromedex DrugDex.(C) Two articles from major peer reviewed medical journals that present data supporting the proposed off-label use or uses as generally safe and effective unless there is clear and convincing contradictory evidence presented in a major peer reviewed medical journal.(b) (1) A health care service plan contract that covers prescription drug benefits shall not be issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this state if the contract limits or excludes coverage for brand name or generic mifepristone solely on the basis that the drug is prescribed for a use that is different from the use for which that drug has been approved for marketing by the FDA or that varies from an approved risk evaluation and mitigation strategy pursuant to Section 355-1 of Title 21 of the United States Code, except if the state deems it necessary to address an imminent health or safety concern regarding brand name or generic mifepristone.(2) A health care service plan contract that covers prescription drug benefits shall include coverage for brand name or generic mifepristone, even if the drug has not been approved by the FDA for abortion if the requirements of paragraph (3) have been met, except if the state deems it necessary to address an imminent health or safety concern regarding brand name or generic mifepristone.(3) If name brand or generic mifepristone has not been approved by the FDA for abortion, coverage is required pursuant to paragraph (2) if the drug is a recognized medication for abortion by the World Health Organization (WHO) Model List of Essential Medicines, the WHO abortion care guideline, or the National Academies of Science, Engineering, and Medicine Consensus Study Report, or if the state approves its use based on peer-reviewed studies and prior approval of the drug that is no longer in effect.(c) It shall be the responsibility of the participating prescriber to submit to the plan documentation supporting compliance with the requirements of subdivision (a), if requested by the plan.(d) Any coverage required by this section shall also include medically necessary services associated with the administration of a drug, subject to the conditions of the contract.(e) For purposes of this section, “life-threatening” means either or both of the following:(1) Diseases or conditions where the likelihood of death is high unless the course of the disease is interrupted.(2) Diseases or conditions with potentially fatal outcomes, where the end point of clinical intervention is survival.(f) For purposes of this section, “chronic and seriously debilitating” means diseases or conditions that require ongoing treatment to maintain remission or prevent deterioration and cause significant long-term morbidity.(g) The provision of drugs and services when required by this section shall not, in itself, give rise to liability on the part of the plan.(h) This section does not prohibit the use of a formulary, copayment, technology assessment panel, or similar mechanism as a means for appropriately controlling the utilization of a drug that is prescribed for a use that is different from the use for which that drug has been approved for marketing by the FDA.(i) If a plan denies coverage pursuant to this section on the basis that its use is experimental or investigational, that decision is subject to review under Section 1370.4.(j) Health care service plan contracts for the delivery of Medi-Cal services under the Waxman-Duffy Prepaid Health Plan Act (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code) are exempt from the requirements of this section.SEC. 16. Section 1375.61 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1375.61. (a) A contract between a health care service plan and a provider of health care services shall not contain any term that would result in termination or nonrenewal of the contract or otherwise penalize the provider, based solely on either of the following:(1) A civil judgment issued in another state, a criminal conviction in another state, or another disciplinary action in another state, if the judgment, conviction, or disciplinary action is based solely on the application of another state’s law that interferes with a person’s right to receive care that would be lawful if provided in this state.(2) The manufacture, transport, distribution, delivery, receipt, acquisition, sale, possession, furnishment, dispensation, repackaging, or storage of brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that is lawful under the laws of the state.(b) A health care service plan shall not discriminate, with respect to the provision of, or contracts for, professional services, against a licensed provider solely on the basis of either of the following:(1) A civil judgment issued in another state, a criminal conviction in another state, or another disciplinary action in another state if the judgment, conviction, or disciplinary action is based solely on the application of another state’s law that interferes with a person’s right to receive care that would be lawful if provided in this state.(2) The manufacture, transport, distribution, delivery, receipt, acquisition, sale, possession, furnishment, dispensation, repackaging, or storage of brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that is lawful under the laws of the state.(c) This section does not apply to a civil judgment, a criminal conviction, or a disciplinary action imposed in another state based upon conduct that would subject a provider to claim, charge, or action under the laws of this state.SEC. 17. Section 111376 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:111376. (a) The department may adopt regulations relating to brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion by including brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion within, or excluding brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion from, the requirements of this article, whether or not the inclusion or exclusion of the drug is in accordance with federal law.(b) Notwithstanding any other state law, and consistent with Sections 1 and 1.1 of Article I of the California Constitution, this article shall not apply to brand name or generic mifepristone in the event of a labeling change or in the absence of its United States Food and Drug Administration approval if it is recommended for use by the World Health Organization and its labeling was true and accurate at the time of manufacture, except if the state deems it necessary to address an imminent health or safety concern regarding brand name or generic mifepristone.SEC. 18. Section 111480 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:111480. (a) A drug or device sold by filling or refilling a written or oral prescription of a practitioner licensed to prescribe the drug or device shall be exempt from the labeling requirements of Sections 111335, 111340, 111355, 111360, 111365, 111375, 111380, 111385, 111395, 111415, and 111420, if the drug or device bears a label displaying all of the following:(1) Except when the prescriber orders otherwise, either the manufacturer’s trade name of the drug, or the generic name and the name of the manufacturer. Commonly used abbreviations may be used. Preparations containing two or more active ingredients may be identified by the manufacturer’s trade name or the commonly used name or the principal active ingredients.(2) The directions for the use of the drug or device.(3) The name of the patient(s).(4) The name of the prescriber.(5) The date of issue.(6) The name, address of the furnisher, and prescription number or other means of identifying the prescription.(7) The strength of the drug or drugs dispensed.(8) The quantity of the drug or drugs dispensed.(9) The expiration date of the effectiveness of the drug or device if the information is included on the original label of the manufacturer of the drug or device.(b) Brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion sold by filling or refilling a written or oral prescription of a practitioner licensed to prescribe the drug or device shall be exempt from the labeling requirements of Sections 111335, 111340, 111355, 111360, 111365, 111375, 111380, 111385, 111395, 111415, and 111420, if the label complies with subdivision (g) of Section 4076 of the Business and Professions Code.(c) If a pharmacist dispenses a prescribed drug by means of a unit dose medication system, as defined by administrative regulation, for a patient in a skilled nursing, intermediate care or other health care facility, the requirements of subdivision (a) shall be satisfied if the unit dose medication system contains the information required pursuant to subdivision (a) or the information is otherwise readily available at the time of drug administration.(d) The exemption in subdivision (a) shall not apply to any drug or device dispensed in the course of the conduct of a business of dispensing drugs or devices pursuant to diagnosis by mail, or to a drug or device dispensed in violation of Section 111470.SEC. 19. Section 10123.195 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:10123.195. (a) A group or individual disability insurance policy issued, delivered, or renewed in this state or certificate of group disability insurance issued, delivered, or renewed in this state pursuant to a master group policy issued, delivered, or renewed in another state that, as a provision of hospital, medical, or surgical services, directly or indirectly covers prescription drugs shall not limit or exclude coverage for a drug on the basis that the drug is prescribed for a use that is different from the use for which that drug has been approved for marketing by the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA), provided that all of the following conditions have been met:(1) The drug is approved by the FDA.(2) (A) The drug is prescribed by a contracting licensed health care professional for the treatment of a life-threatening condition; or(B) The drug is prescribed by a contracting licensed health care professional for the treatment of a chronic and seriously debilitating condition, the drug is medically necessary to treat that condition, and the drug is on the insurer’s formulary, if any.(3) The drug has been recognized for treatment of that condition by any of the following:(A) The American Hospital Formulary Service’s Drug Information.(B) One of the following compendia, if recognized by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services as part of an anticancer chemotherapeutic regimen:(i) The Elsevier Gold Standard’s Clinical Pharmacology.(ii) The National Comprehensive Cancer Network Drug and Biologics Compendium.(iii) The Thomson Micromedex DrugDex.(C) Two articles from major peer reviewed medical journals that present data supporting the proposed off-label use or uses as generally safe and effective unless there is clear and convincing contradictory evidence presented in a major peer reviewed medical journal.(b) (1) A group or individual health insurance policy issued, delivered, or renewed in this state or certificate of group health insurance issued, delivered, or renewed in this state pursuant to a master group policy issued, delivered, or renewed in another state that, as a provision of hospital, medical, or surgical services, directly or indirectly covers prescription drugs shall not limit or exclude coverage for brand name or generic mifepristone solely on the basis that the drug is prescribed for a use that is different from the use for which that drug has been approved for marketing by the FDA or that varies from an approved risk evaluation and mitigation strategy pursuant to Section 355-1 of Title 21 of the United States Code, except if the state deems it necessary to address an imminent health or safety concern regarding brand name or generic mifepristone.(2) A group or individual health insurance policy issued, delivered, or renewed in this state or certificate of group health insurance issued, delivered, or renewed in this state pursuant to a master group policy issued, delivered, or renewed in another state that, as a provision of hospital, medical, or surgical services, directly or indirectly covers prescription drugs shall include coverage for brand name or generic mifepristone, even if the drug has not been approved by the FDA for abortion if the requirements of paragraph (3) have been met, except if the state deems it necessary to address an imminent health or safety concern regarding brand name or generic mifepristone.(3) If name brand or generic mifepristone has not been approved by the FDA for abortion, coverage is required pursuant to paragraph (2) if the drug is a recognized medication for abortion by the World Health Organization (WHO) Model List of Essential Medicines, the WHO abortion care guideline, or the National Academies of Science, Engineering, and Medicine Consensus Study Report, or if the state approves its use based on peer-reviewed studies and prior approval of the drug that is no longer in effect.(c) It shall be the responsibility of the contracting prescriber to submit to the insurer documentation supporting compliance with the requirements of subdivision (a), if requested by the insurer.(d) Any coverage required by this section shall also include medically necessary services associated with the administration of a drug subject to the conditions of the policy.(e) For purposes of this section, “life-threatening” means either or both of the following:(1) Diseases or conditions where the likelihood of death is high unless the course of the disease is interrupted.(2) Diseases or conditions with potentially fatal outcomes, where the end point of clinical intervention is survival.(f) For purposes of this section, “chronic and seriously debilitating” means diseases or conditions that require ongoing treatment to maintain remission or prevent deterioration and cause significant long-term morbidity.(g) The provision of drugs and services when required by this section shall not, in itself, give rise to liability on the part of the insurer.(h) This section shall not apply to a policy of disability insurance that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses that is issued outside of California to an employer whose principal place of business is located outside of California.(i) This section does not prohibit the use of a formulary, copayment, technology assessment panel, or similar mechanism as a means for appropriately controlling the utilization of a drug that is prescribed for a use that is different from the use for which that drug has been approved for marketing by the FDA.(j) If an insurer denies coverage pursuant to this section on the basis that its use is experimental or investigational, that decision is subject to review under the Independent Medical Review System of Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 10169).(k) This section is not applicable to vision-only, dental-only, Medicare or Champus supplement, disability income, long-term care, accident-only, specified disease or hospital confinement indemnity insurance.SEC. 20. Section 10133.641 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:10133.641. (a) A contract between a health insurer and a provider of health care services shall not contain any term that would result in termination or nonrenewal of the contract or otherwise penalize the provider, based solely on either of the following:(1) A civil judgment issued in another state, a criminal conviction in another state, or another professional disciplinary action in another state, if the judgment, conviction, or professional disciplinary action is based solely on the application of another state’s law that interferes with a person’s right to receive care that would be lawful if provided in this state.(2) The manufacture, transport, distribution, delivery, receipt, acquisition, sale, possession, furnishment, dispensation, repackaging, or storage of brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that is lawful under the laws of the state.(b) A health insurer shall not discriminate, with respect to the provision of, or contracts for, professional services, against a licensed provider solely on the basis of either of the following:(1) A civil judgment issued in another state, a criminal conviction in another state, or another professional disciplinary action in another state if the judgment, conviction, or professional disciplinary action is based solely on the application of another state’s law that interferes with a person’s right to receive care that would be lawful if provided in this state.(2) The manufacture, transport, distribution, delivery, receipt, acquisition, sale, possession, furnishment, dispensation, repackaging, or storage of brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that is lawful under the laws of the state.(c) This section does not apply to a civil judgment, a criminal conviction, or a disciplinary action imposed in another state based upon conduct that would subject a provider to claim, charge, or action under the laws of this state.(d) The commissioner may enforce this section pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. This subdivision does not impair or restrict the commissioner’s enforcement authority pursuant to another provision of this code or the Administrative Procedure Act.SEC. 21. Section 1108 of the Penal Code is repealed.SEC. 22. Section 3405 of the Penal Code is amended to read:3405. (a) A condition or restriction shall not be imposed upon the obtaining of an abortion by an incarcerated person, pursuant to Sections 1 and 1.1 of Article I of the California Constitution and the Reproductive Privacy Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 123460) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code), other than those contained in those provisions. Impermissible restrictions include, but are not limited to, imposing gestational limits inconsistent with state law, unreasonably delaying access to the procedure, or requiring court-ordered transport. Incarcerated persons found to be pregnant and desiring abortions, shall be permitted to determine their eligibility for an abortion pursuant to state and federal law, and if determined to be eligible, shall be permitted to obtain an abortion after giving informed consent.(b) The rights provided by this section shall be posted in at least one conspicuous place to which all incarcerated persons capable of becoming pregnant have access.SEC. 23. Section 4028 of the Penal Code is amended to read:4028. (a) A condition or restriction shall not be imposed upon the obtaining of an abortion by a person detained in any local detention facility, pursuant to Sections 1 and 1.1 of Article I of the California Constitution and the Reproductive Privacy Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 123460) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code), other than those contained in those provisions. Impermissible restrictions include, but are not limited to, imposing gestational limits inconsistent with state law, unreasonably delaying access to the procedure, or requiring court-ordered transportation. Persons found to be pregnant and desiring abortions shall be permitted to determine their eligibility for an abortion pursuant to state and federal law, and if determined to be eligible, shall be permitted to obtain an abortion, after providing informed consent.(b) For the purposes of this section, “local detention facility” means any city, county, or regional facility used for the confinement for more than 24 hours of a person capable of becoming pregnant.(c) The rights provided by this section shall be posted in at least one conspicuous place to which all incarcerated persons capable of becoming pregnant have access.SEC. 24. Section 220 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:220. (a) A condition or restriction shall not be imposed upon the obtaining of an abortion by an individual detained in any local juvenile facility, pursuant to Sections 1 and 1.1 of Article I of the California Constitution and the Reproductive Privacy Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 123460) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code), other than those contained in those provisions. Individuals found to be pregnant and desiring abortions, shall be permitted to determine their eligibility for an abortion pursuant to law, and if determined to be eligible, shall be permitted to obtain an abortion.(b) For the purposes of this section, “local juvenile facility” means any city, county, or regional facility used for the confinement of juveniles for more than 24 hours.(c) The rights provided by this section shall be posted in at least one conspicuous place to which all committed persons capable of becoming pregnant have access.SEC. 25. Section 1773 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:1773. (a) A condition or restriction shall not be imposed upon the obtaining of an abortion by an individual committed to the Division of Juvenile Facilities, pursuant to Sections 1 and 1.1 of Article I of the California Constitution and the Reproductive Privacy Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 123460) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code), other than those contained in those provisions. Individuals found to be pregnant and desiring abortions shall be permitted to determine their eligibility for an abortion pursuant to law, and if determined to be eligible, shall be permitted to obtain an abortion.(b) The rights provided by this section shall be posted in at least one conspicuous place to which all committed persons capable of becoming pregnant have access.SEC. 26. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.SEC. 27. Section 8.5 of this bill incorporates amendments to Section 4076 of the Business and Professions Code proposed by both this bill and Assembly Bill 1503. That section of this bill shall only become operative if (1) both bills are enacted and become effective on or before January 1, 2026, but this bill becomes operative first, (2) each bill amends Section 4076 of the Business and Professions Code, and (3) this bill is enacted after Assembly Bill 1503, in which case Section 4076 of the Business and Professions Code, as amended by Section 8 of this bill, shall remain operative only until the operative date of Assembly Bill 1503, at which time Section 8.5 of this bill shall become operative.SEC. 28. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SEC. 29. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:To ensure continued access to medication abortion that has been proven safe and effective, it is necessary for this act to take effect immediately.